Maine, session 132, LD1499.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA c. 933 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 933
NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION ACCOUNTABILITY
§7351. Definitions
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, the following terms
have the following meanings.
1. Failure to report. "Failure to report" or "fails to report" means the willful or
negligent failure to report allegations of sexual assault involving a tax-exempt
organization's employees, board members, volunteers or affiliates to the appropriate law
enforcement authorities, as required by state or federal law.
2. Sexual assault. "Sexual assault" means any criminal act that constitutes a sexual
offense under state or federal law, including, but not limited to, sexual assaults as prohibited
pursuant to Title 17-A, chapter 11 and sexual exploitation of minors as prohibited pursuant
to Title 17-A. chapter 12.
3. Tax-exempt organization. "Tax-exempt organization" means an entity that
qualifies for tax-exempt status under the Code, Section 501(c), including, but not limited
to, a religious, charitable, educational or nonprofit organization.
§7352. Mandatory reporting compliance
1. Compliance. A tax-exempt organization shall comply with all state and federal
laws requiring the reporting of allegations of sexual assault involving that tax-exempt
organization's employees, board members, volunteers or affiliates to law enforcement
authorities.
2. Reporting. A tax-exempt organization shall implement and enforce policies to
ensure that all allegations of sexual assault are reported promptly and transparently.
§7353. Penalty for noncompliance
1. Loss of tax-exempt status; determination and report. If a tax-exempt
organization fails to report allegations of sexual assault on 2 separate occasions within a
10-year period, that organization is no longer entitled to tax-exempt status in this State.
Each instance of failure to report must involve a distinct allegation of sexual assault and
must be substantiated by a court of law or administrative proceeding. The court or fact
finder shall report its findings to the bureau.
2. Revocation process. Upon being notified pursuant to subsection 1 that a tax-
exempt organization has failed to report allegations of sexual assault on at least 2 separate
occasions within a 10-year period, the bureau shall initiate proceedings to revoke that
organization's tax-exempt status for all activities conducted within the State. The bureau
shall inform the tax-exempt organization in writing of its decision and provide the
organization an opportunity to appeal the decision within 30 days.
§7354. Record keeping and public reporting
Page 1 - 132LR1855(01)

1. Record keeping. A tax-exempt organization shall maintain records of all reported
allegations of sexual assault and make those records available for audit by law enforcement
agencies or other designated authorities upon request.
2. Public reporting. A tax-exempt organization that is found in violation of this
chapter shall publicly disclose the details of its failure to report, including any corrective
actions taken.
§7355. Reinstatement of tax-exempt status
An organization whose tax-exempt status has been revoked pursuant to section 7353
may apply for reinstatement of tax-exempt status after a period of 5 years. In order for tax-
exempt status to be reinstated, the organization must demonstrate:
1. Compliance. Full compliance with mandatory reporting pursuant to section 7352;
2. Policies. Implementation of comprehensive child protection policies and training
programs; and
3. Cooperation. Cooperation with law enforcement investigations related to prior
failures to report.
§7356. Rules
The bureau shall adopt rules to implement this chapter, including the process for
notification, appeal and requests for reinstatement of tax-exempt status. Rules adopted
pursuant to this section are routine technical rules pursuant to Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2-A.